Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3606
First purchaser, defined.

First purchaser shall mean any person, public or private corporation, association, partnership, or limited liability company buying, accepting for shipment, or otherwise acquiring the property in or to corn from a grower, and shall include a mortgagee, pledgee, lienor, or other person, public or private, having a claim against the grower, when the actual or constructive possession of such corn is taken as part payment or in satisfaction of such mortgage, pledge, lien, or claim.

Laws 1978, LB 639, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 73.